zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 小動物用品: 小動物床具; 小動物飼料; 小動物籠配件; 小動物籠; 小型動物零嘴
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til små dyr: Strøelse til små dyr; Foder til små dyr; Tilbehør til værested for smådyr; Væresteder og bure til små dyr; Godbidder til små dyr
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Kisállatkellékek: Kisállatalom; Kisállateledel; Kisállatélőhely-kiegészítők; Kisállatélőhelyek és -ketrecek; Kisállatcsemegék
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Productos para animales pequeños: Artículos para camas de animales pequeños; Alimento para animales pequeños; Accesorios para habitáculos para animales pequeños; Jaulas y habitáculos para animales pequeños; Golosinas para animales pequeños
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Kleintierzubehör: Decken & Streu für Kleintiere; Futter für Kleintiere; Zubehör für Lebensräume von Kleintieren; Lebensräume & Gehege für Kleintiere; Leckerli für Kleintiere
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์เล็ก: ที่นอนสัตว์เล็ก; อาหารสำหรับสัตว์เล็ก; อุปกรณ์ที่อยู่อาศัยสำหรับสัตว์เล็ก; ที่อยู่อาศัยและกรงสำหรับสัตว์เล็ก; ขนมสำหรับสัตว์เล็ก
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre malé zvieratá: Podstielka pre malé zvieratá; Krmivo pre malé zvieratá; Príslušenstvo pre biotopy malých zvierat; Biotopy a klietky pre malé zvieratá; Pochúťky pre malé zvieratá
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Benodigdheden voor kleine dieren: Bedden voor kleine dieren; Voer voor kleine dieren; Accessoires voor kleine-dierverblijven; Verblijven en kooien voor kleine dieren; Snoepjes voor kleine dieren
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla małych zwierząt: Legowiska dla małych zwierząt; Karma dla małych zwierząt; Akcesoria do terrariów dla małych zwierząt; Pomieszczenia i klatki dla małych zwierząt; Przekąski dla małych zwierząt
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za male životinje: Stelje za male životinje; Hrana za male životinje; Dodaci za stanište malih životinja; Staništa i kavezi za male životinje; Poslastice za male životinje
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės smulkiems gyvūnams: Pakratai smulkiems gyvūnams; Maistas smulkiems gyvūnams; Indų smulkiems gyvūnams priedai; Indai smulkiems gyvūnams; Skanėstai smulkiems gyvūnams
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Articoli per animali piccola taglia: Giaciglio piccolo per animali; Cibo per animali piccola taglia; Accessori habitat piccoli animali; Habitat/gabbie piccoli animali; Ricompense per animali di piccola taglia
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για μικρά ζώα: Κλινοσκεπάσματα για μικρά ζώα; Τροφή για μικρά ζώα; Αξεσουάρ ενδιαιτημάτων μικρών ζώων; Ενδιαιτήματα & κλουβιά μικρών ζώων; Λιχουδιές για μικρά ζώα
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 小动物用品: 小动物窝铺用品; 小动物食物; 小动物住所配件; 小动物住所/笼子; 小型宠物零食
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú nhỏ: Giường cho thú nhỏ; Thức ăn dành cho thú nhỏ; Phụ kiện cho nhà của thú nhỏ; Nhà và chuồng dành cho thú nhỏ; Đồ ăn thưởng cho thú nhỏ
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale mici: Așternut pentru animale mici; Hrană pentru animale mici; Accesorii pentru animale mici; Habitate și cuști pentru animale mici; Recompense pentru animale mici
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 소형 반려동물 용품: 소형 반려동물 침대; 소형 반려동물 사료; 소형 반려동물 집 부대용품; 소형 반려동물 집/케이지; 소형 반려동물 간식
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Produkter for små dyr: Senger for små dyr; Mat for små dyr; Habitattilbehør for små dyr; Habitater og bur for små dyr; Godter for små dyr
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Potřeby pro drobná zvířata: Stelivo pro drobná zvířata; Krmivo pro drobná zvířata; Domky pro drobná zvířata – příslušenství; Domky a klece pro drobná zvířata; Odměny pro malá domácí zvířata
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > 小動物用品: 小動物用寝床; 小動物用フード; 小動物飼育用品; 小動物飼育ケージ; 小動物用おやつ
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za male živali: Stelja za male živali; Hrana za male živali; Dodatki za bivališča za male živali; Bivališča in kletke za male živali; Priboljški za male živali
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Artigos para animais pequenos: Camas para animais pequenos; Ração para animais pequenos; Acessórios de habitat para animais pequenos; Habitats e gaiolas para animais pequenos; Snacks para animais pequenos
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais pequenos: Forração para animais pequenos; Comida para animais pequenos; Acessórios para moradia de animais pequenos; Moradias e gaiolas para animais pequenos; Petiscos para animais pequenos
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Small Animal Supplies: Small Animal Bedding; Small Animal Food; Small Animal Habitat Accessories; Small Animal Habitats & Cages; Small Animal Treats
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Стоки за малки животни: Постелки за малки животни; Храна за малки животни; Аксесоари за местообитания на малки животни; Местообитания и клетки за малки животни; Лакомства за малки животни
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Smådjurstillbehör: Bomaterial för smådjur; Smådjursmat; Tillbehör till smådjursburar; Smådjursburar; Smådjursgodis
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Küçük Hayvan Ürünleri: Küçük Hayvan Yatakları; Küçük Hayvan Yemleri; Küçük Hayvan Ortam Aksesuarları; Küçük Hayvan Ortamları ve Kafesleri; Küçük Hayvan Atıştırmalıkları
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Accessoires pour petits animaux: Literie pour petits animaux; Nourriture pour petits animaux; Accessoires pour abris de petits animaux; Abris et cages pour petits animaux; Friandises pour petits animaux
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для мелких животных: Наполнители для мелких животных; Корм для мелких животных; Аксессуары для клеток для мелких животных; Клетки для мелких животных; Лакомства для мелких животных
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Pieneläintarvikkeet: Pieneläinten kuivikkeet; Pieneläinten ruoka; Pieneläinten asumisen tarvikkeet; Pieneläinten asuinpaikat ja häkit; Pieneläinten herkut